Georgia, session 2025_26, SB59.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 48-5-7.4 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to preferential
assessment for bona fide conservation use property and bona fide residential transitional
property, is amended by revising subsection (b) as follows:
"(b) Except in the case of the underlying portion of a tract of real property on which is
actually located a constructed storm-water wetland, the following additional rules shall
apply to the qualification of conservation use property for current use assessment:
(1) When one-half or more of the area of a single tract of real property is used for a
qualifying purpose, then such tract shall be considered as used for such qualifying
purpose unless some other type of business is being operated on the unused portion;
S. B. 59
- 1 -

LC 44 2942
provided, however, that such unused portion must be minimally managed so that it does
not contribute significantly to erosion or other environmental or conservation problems.
The lease of hunting rights or the use of the property for hunting purposes shall not
constitute another type of business. The charging of admission for use of the property for
fishing purposes shall not constitute another type of business;
(2)(A)(i) The owner of a tract, lot, or parcel of land totaling less than ten acres shall be
required by the tax assessor to submit additional relevant records regarding proof of
bona fide conservation use for qualified property that on or after May 1, 2012, is either
first made subject to a covenant or is subject to a renewal of a previous covenant. The
provisions of this paragraph relating to requiring additional relevant records regarding
proof of bona fide conservation use shall not apply to such property if the owner of the
subject property provides one or more of the following:
(i)(I) Proof that such owner has filed with the Internal Revenue Service a
Schedule E, reporting farm related income or loss, or a Schedule F, with Form 1040,
or, if applicable, a Form 4835, pertaining to such property;
(ii)(II) Proof that such owner has incurred expenses for the qualifying use; or
(iii)(III) Proof that such owner has generated income from the qualifying use.
(ii) Prior to a denial of eligibility under this paragraph, the tax assessor shall conduct
and provide proof of a visual, on-site inspection of the property. Reasonable notice
shall be provided to the property owner before being allowed a visual, on-site
inspection of the property by the tax assessor.
(B) The owner of a tract, lot, or parcel of land totaling ten acres or more shall not be
required by the tax assessor to submit additional relevant records regarding proof of
bona fide conservation use for qualified property that on or after May 1, 2012, is either
first made subject to a covenant or is subject to a renewal of a previous covenant;
(3) No property shall qualify as bona fide conservation use property if such current use
assessment would result in any person who has a beneficial interest in such property,
S. B. 59
- 2 -

LC 44 2942
including any interest in the nature of stock ownership, receiving in any tax year any
benefit of current use assessment as to more than 2,000 acres. If any taxpayer has any
beneficial interest in more than 2,000 acres of tangible real property which is devoted to
bona fide conservation uses, such taxpayer shall apply for current use assessment only
as to 2,000 acres of such land;
(4) No property shall qualify as bona fide conservation use property if it is leased to a
person or entity which would not be entitled to conservation use assessment. The
provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to a corporation, a partnership, a general
partnership, a limited partnership, a limited corporation, or a limited liability company
registered with the Secretary of State that meets the following conditions:
(A)(i) Its ownership includes only natural or naturalized citizens;
(ii) It has as its primary purpose the production of agricultural products or timber
from or on the land, including, but not limited to, subsistence farming or commercial
production; and
(iii) It derives 80 percent or more of its gross income from bona fide conservation
uses, including earnings on investments directly related to past or future bona fide
conservation uses, within this state; or
(B) At least one of its members has no less than a 25 percent ownership interest in the
property being leased and would be entitled to conservation use assessment;
(5) No property shall qualify as bona fide conservation use property if such property is
at the time of application for current use assessment subject to a restrictive covenant
which prohibits the use of the property for the specific purpose described in
subparagraph (a)(1)(E) of this Code section for which bona fide conservation use
qualification is sought; and
(6) No otherwise qualified property shall be denied current use assessment on the
grounds that no soil map is available for the county in which such property is located;
provided, however, that, if no soil map is available for the county in which such property
S. B. 59
- 3 -

LC 44 2942
is located, the owner making an application for current use assessment shall provide the
board of tax assessors with a certified soil survey of the subject property unless another
method for determining the soil type of the subject property is authorized in writing by
such board."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning on or after
January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 59
- 4 -